Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,158
Methods of payment authorized.

A county treasurer or his or her agent may accept credit
cards, charge cards, debit cards, or electronic funds transfers as a means
of payment for registration pursuant to section 13-609.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 158;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 85.